Arkansas, session 2025, SB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-1-201(b)(24), concerning the Uniform
Commercial Code definition of "money", is amended to read as follows:
(24) “Money” means a medium of exchange that is currently
authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government. The term includes
a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization
or by agreement between two (2) or more countries. "Money" does not include a
central bank digital currency.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-1-201(b), concerning the general
definitions used in the Uniform Commercial Code, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
*ANS176*
01/28/2025 9:15:16 AM ANS176

SB133
(44) "Central bank digital currency" means a digital currency, a
digital medium of exchange, or a digital monetary unit of account issued by
the Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, a foreign government, a foreign
central bank, or a foreign reserve system that is made directly available to
a consumer by such entities. "Central bank digital currency" includes a
digital currency, a digital medium of exchange, or a digital monetary unit of
account issued by the Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, a foreign
government, a foreign central bank, or a foreign reserve system that is
processed or validated directly by such entities.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-9-102(29), concerning the Uniform
Commercial Code — Secured Transactions definition of "deposit account", is
amended to read as follows:
(29) “Deposit account” means a demand, time, savings, passbook,
or similar account maintained with a bank. The term "deposit account" does
not include investment property, central bank digital currency, or accounts
evidenced by an instrument.



















01/28/2025 9:15:16 AM ANS176